Wyoming, session 2026, SF0065.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(a) On July 1, 2026, the Wyoming business council is
repealed, terminated and shall cease to function, subject
to the requirements of this act.

(b) On the effective date of this section, the
Wyoming business council shall:

(i) Not accept any new applications for grants,
loans, bonds or other funding for any programs operated by
the Wyoming business council or for any programs for which
the council has been delegated administration or operation;

(ii) Not process any pending applications for
grants, loans, financial aid, bonds or other funding for
any programs operated by the Wyoming business council or
for any programs for which the council has been delegated
administration or operation;

(iii) Not approve any grants or financial aid or
disburse any grant funds for financial aid for grants or
applications not approved or executed before the effective
date of this section. For purposes of this paragraph, the
business council may disburse grant funds and financial aid
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
encumbered or obligated before the effective date of this
section until July 1, 2026;

(iv) Not approve any loans or bonds or disburse
any funds for loans or bonds not approved or executed
before the effective date of this section;

(v) Take all actions necessary to transfer the
functions and programs specified in section 2 of this act
in accordance with section 2 of this act;

(vi) Take all actions necessary to effectuate
this act and wind up all activities of the Wyoming business
council not later than July 1, 2026.

(c) On the effective date of this section, no new
capital construction projects as defined in W.S.
9-2-3001(b)(ii) specified for or on behalf of the Wyoming
business council shall commence or begin construction.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impair any
project commenced or in progress as of the effective date
of this section.

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(d) Not later than April 30, 2026, the Wyoming
business council shall report to the joint appropriations
committee, the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee, the governor, the state
budget department, the state loan and investment board and
the Wyoming energy authority on all of the following:

(i) The total amount of grant funds and
financial aid obligated for disbursement but not disbursed
for grants and financial aid approved and executed before
the effective date of this section, itemized by program;

(ii) The number of loans executed by the
business council before the effective date of this section
that are still outstanding as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. In reporting information
under this paragraph, the business council shall itemize
each loan by program and report the recipient of each
outstanding loan, the terms and conditions of each
outstanding loan, the repayment schedule for each loan and
the amount remaining to be repaid for each outstanding
loan;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(iii) The number of bonds executed by the
business council before the effective date of this section
that are still outstanding as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. In reporting information
under this paragraph, the business council shall report
each outstanding bond, the terms and conditions of each
outstanding bond and any amount remaining to be paid or
repaid for each outstanding bond;

(iv) All real and personal property owned or
held by the business council as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. Information reported under
this paragraph shall include the program or function for
which the property is owned or held;

(v) Each program and function administered or
operated by the business council specified in section 2(d)
of this act;

(vi) Each set or group of funds received by the
business council specified in section 2(d) of this act;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(vii) The actions taken by the business council
to support or assist in the completion of the forensic
audit required under subsection (h) of this section;

(viii) All actions taken by the business council
to wind up the activities of the council and effectuate
this act;

(ix) All actions taken by the business council
to transfer the functions and programs specified with
section 2 of this act in accordance with section 2 of this
act;

(x) Whether any further legislative changes are
needed to effectuate this act and the purposes of this act.

(e) On July 1, 2026, the state budget department
shall assume all duties, assets, liabilities, investments,
equity positions, ownership interests and other interests
of the Wyoming business council with respect to all
existing loans, grants, financial aid and other obligations
of the Wyoming business council executed before the
effective date of this section, subject to the transfers
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
specified in section 2 of this act. The state budget
department shall administer the grants, financial aid,
bonds and loans in accordance with the terms and conditions
of those grants, financial aid, bonds and loans and in
accordance with all applicable laws as those laws existed
before their repeal on July 1, 2026.

(f) On July 1, 2026:

(i) All unexpended, unobligated funds held by
the Wyoming business council or that are in accounts
administered by the business council shall revert to the
account or source from which the funds were appropriated to
the Wyoming business council or the accounts administered
by the business council, except as otherwise provided in
this subsection;

(ii) All unexpended, unobligated funds in the
economic development account created in W.S.
9-12-301(a)(iii), the economic development enterprise fund
account created in W.S. 9-12-305 and the large project
account created in W.S. 9-12-308(a) shall be transferred by
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
the state auditor to the state budget department for
administration in accordance with this act;

(iii) All unexpended, unobligated funds within
the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector
partnership subaccount created in W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(iii),
as repealed by this act, shall be transferred by the state
auditor to the Wyoming workforce development-priority
economic sector account created in W.S. 9-2-2611(p), as
created by this act;

(iv) All unexpended, unobligated funds within
the broadband development subaccount created in W.S.
9-12-1404(a)(ii), as repealed by this act, shall be
transferred by the state auditor to the broadband
development account created in W.S. 9-1-225, as created by
this act;

(v) All funds appropriated to the Wyoming
business council, including funds appropriated during the
2026 budget session, for implementing the tourism program
and functions in accordance with W.S. 9-12-1001 and
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
9-12-1002 shall be transferred by the state auditor to the
office of tourism;

(vi) All funds appropriated to the Wyoming
business council during the 2026 budget session shall
revert to the account, fund or source from which the funds
were appropriated;

(vii) All real and personal property held by the
business council shall pass to and be vested in the state,
consistent with W.S. 9-12-103(c), as repealed by this act.
For purposes of this paragraph, the state agencies and
entities specified in this act shall administer the
property transferred under this paragraph in accordance
with the requirements of this act. The Wyoming energy
authority, the state budget department and the office of
the governor shall take all actions necessary to effectuate
the transfer of property specified in this paragraph.

(g) On July 1, 2026, the authorization for any
full-time positions, part-time positions and at-will
employment contract positions authorized for or allocated
to the Wyoming business council, including any positions
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
authorized during the 2026 budget session, shall cease and
be terminated.

(h) The state department of audit shall complete or
cause to be completed a forensic audit of the Wyoming
business council. The forensic audit shall be commenced as
soon as possible after the effective date of this section.
Upon the completion of the audit, the department of audit
shall report the results and findings of the audit to the
joint appropriations committee and the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee. If the
audit is unable to be completed by July 1, 2026, the
department of audit shall report to the joint
appropriations committee and the joint minerals, business
and economic development interim committee not later than
May 29, 2026 with that fact and the reasons for why the
audit will not be completed by July 1, 2026. The forensic
audit shall include, at a minimum:

(i) A list or accounting of all funds currently
held, received and expended by the Wyoming business
council;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(ii) A list or accounting of all accounts used
to hold funds appropriated to, held by or expended by the
business council, including all accounts associated with
the business council that are specified by law, any
accounts created by the business council and any accounts
created by the state auditor or any other state agency or
entity on behalf of the business council;

(iii) A list or accounting of all funds from
private sources donated to or otherwise provided to the
business council that are currently held or maintained by
the business council;

(iv) A review of whether the business council
has administered, held, expended and distributed funds in
accordance with all applicable laws;

(v) A review of whether the business council has
accounted for, held and expended funds in conformance with
generally accepted accounting principles.

(j) On the effective date of this section, the
Wyoming business council shall identify and hold all funds
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
received by the business council from private sources and
local governmental entities. For purposes of this
subsection, "private source" means any source that is not a
governmental entity. The following shall apply to funds
from private sources and local governmental entities
identified in this subsection:

(i) Not later than July 1, 2026, the business
council shall contact each private source and local
governmental entity with funds donated to or held by the
business council to consult with the private source or
local governmental entity as to the source's or entity's
wishes or directives for the disposition of the donated or
provided funds;

(ii) The business council shall refund or cause
to be refunded all unexpended, unobligated funds of each
private source and local governmental entity that requests
that donated or provided funds be refunded or returned to
the private source or local governmental entity;

(iii) A private source or local governmental
entity may direct the unexpended, unobligated funds of the
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
private source or local governmental entity to another
agency or entity in state government or for another
purpose. Not later than July 1, 2026, the business council
shall transfer or cause to be transferred all unexpended,
unobligated funds identified in this paragraph to the
appropriate state agency or entity in accordance with the
stated directives of the private sources and local
governmental entities;

(iv) For donated or provided funds from private
sources and local governmental entities who cannot be
reached or decline to direct the disposition of the donated
or provided funds, the funds shall be transferred to the
state budget department on July 1, 2026 to be used to
implement this act, unless:

(A) The terms and conditions of the
provided funds or donation restrict the use of the funds
for a specified purpose or program; or

(B) Another provision of law prohibits the
transfer of funds under this subsection.

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
Section 2.

(a) The Wyoming energy conservation improvement
program created in W.S. 9-12-1201 through 9-12-1203 is
hereby transferred to the Wyoming energy authority on July
1, 2026. All property, equipment, obligations and
unexpended funds of the Wyoming energy conservation
improvement program shall be transferred from the Wyoming
business council to the Wyoming energy authority on July 1,
2026, except as provided in this section.

(b) The Wyoming minerals to value added products
program created in W.S. 9-20-101 through 9-20-104 is hereby
transferred to the Wyoming energy authority on July 1,
2026. All property, equipment, obligations and unexpended
funds of the Wyoming minerals to value added products
program are transferred from the Wyoming business council
to the Wyoming energy authority on July 1, 2026, except as
provided in this section.

(c) The broadband development program created in W.S.
9-12-1501 through 9-12-1510 is hereby transferred to the
state loan and investment board on July 1, 2026. All
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
property, equipment, obligations and unexpended funds of
the broadband development program are transferred from the
Wyoming business council to the state loan and investment
board on July 1, 2026, except as provided in this section.

(d) Unless otherwise provided by this act, on July 1,
2026, the following functions and programs, and all
property, equipment, obligations and unexpended funds of
the following functions and programs, are hereby
transferred to the state budget department:

(i) Any funds held or invested by or for the
Wyoming business council for any programs for which the
business council has statutory authority or other delegated
authority to operate and administer, and the associated
programs and functions connected to or funded by those
funds;

(ii) Any funds received by the business council
from any nonstate source for disbursement or expenditure
for any purpose, program or function for which the business
council has statutory authority or other delegated
authority to operate and administer, and the associated
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
programs and functions connected to or funded by those
funds;

(iii) The administration of any funds or
accounts held or administered by the Wyoming business
council containing funds or created within the revolving
investment fund created under article 16, section 12 of the
Wyoming constitution;

(iv) Any other program, function or group of
funds assigned to the business council by law not otherwise
transferred or repealed in this act;

(v) Any other program, function or group of
funds delegated by another state agency or entity to the
business council, or for which the business council has
assumed authority, administration or oversight, not
otherwise transferred or repealed in this act.

(e) The following shall apply to the reorganization
specified in subsections (a) through (d) of this section:

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(i) No plan of reorganization under W.S.
9-2-1707(a)(iii) for the transfer of the programs and
functions specified in this section shall be required;

(ii) Upon the transfer of the programs and
functions specified in this section, the agencies specified
in this section to assume those programs and functions
shall assume all duties and authorities granted under
Wyoming law related to the programs and functions assumed.

Section 3.

(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair
any existing contracts, agreements or other obligations of
the Wyoming business council executed before the effective
date of this section.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the state budget
department shall, to the greatest extent authorized by law,
fulfill existing agreements, contracts and other
obligations of the Wyoming business council in accordance
with the requirements of this act. To the extent that the
Wyoming business council has outstanding contracts,
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
agreements or other obligations that cannot be assumed
lawfully by the state budget department as provided in this
act, the office of the governor shall assume those
contracts, agreements or other obligations.

Section 4. W.S. 9-1-225 is created to read:

9-1-225. Broadband development account.

(a) The broadband development subaccount created in
W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(ii) is hereby continued as the broadband
development account. Funds within this account may be
expended by the state loan and investment board to:

(i) Provide funding for agreements entered into
pursuant to W.S. 9-12-1501 through 9-12-1510;

(ii) Provide the state's share of any matching
funds required for the state to receive federal funds under
any federal broadband program including, but not limited
to, the broadband equity, access and deployment program
established by the federal Infrastructure Investment and
Jobs Act, P.L. 117-58; 135 Stat. 429;
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(iii) Pay the reasonable administrative expenses
of the state loan and investment board in an amount not to
exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00).

Section 5. W.S. 9-1-202(a), 9-2-1004 by creating new
subsections (d) and (e), 9-2-2601(d), 9-2-2604(c),
9-2-2610(a)(xii) and (xvi), 9-2-2611(a), (c), (m), (o)(ii)
and by creating a new subsection (p), 9-2-2906(b)(xii),
9-2-3001(b)(i), 9-4-715(n)(intro), 9-12-1002(a)(intro),
9-12-1501(a), (d), (e)(intro), (f), (g) and (h) by creating
a new paragraph (iii), 9-12-1502(a) and (b),
9-12-1503(a)(xiii), (b), (c)(intro) and (vi),
9-12-1504(a)(intro), (b) and (c), 9-12-1505(a), (b)(intro)
and (c), 9-12-1506(c), 9-12-1507(a)(intro), (i) and (b),
9-12-1509(a), (b)(intro), (iii), (iv), (v)(intro), (A) and
(c), 9-12-1510(a)(intro), (v)(A), (B) and (b),
9-23-102(a)(i), 9-23-105(f)(intro), (i)(intro), (ii) and
(h), 9-23-106(g), 10-3-601(c), 11-10-115(a)(vi), 15-1-709,
17-11-104(a)(iv), 17-11-110(a), 21-16-1905(b), 21-18-104,
27-13-102(a)(intro), 37-5-503(j) and by creating a new
subsection (k), 37-5-504(a)(xiii),
39-15-105(a)(viii)(S)(III)(4), 39-16-105(a)(viii)(H)(III)(4)
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
and 40-11-102(b), (c) and by creating a new subsection (d)
are amended to read:

9-1-202. Removal of appointive officers and
commissioners; reason for removal to be filed.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and
except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
may be removed by the governor, at the governor's pleasure,
if appointed by the governor to serve as head of a state
agency, department or division, or as a member of a state
board or commission. The governor may only remove a member
of the Wyoming business council as provided in W.S.
9-12-103.

9-2-1004. Duties of the department; receipt of
monthly statements of income, revenues and expenditures of
state agencies and offices; authority to contract;
purposes; administration of funds.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall
administer funds within the revolving investment fund
created under article 16, section 12 of the Wyoming
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
constitution previously administered by the Wyoming
business council. Funds within the revolving investment
fund and specified within this subsection shall not be
expended except upon legislative appropriation.

(e) Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall
administer any outstanding grants, loans, bonds and other
obligations assumed or entered into by the Wyoming business
council before the repeal of the Wyoming business council.
Not later than November 1, 2026 and each November 1
thereafter, the department shall report to the joint
appropriations committee and the joint minerals, business
and economic development interim committee on the status of
outstanding grant funds to be disbursed, outstanding loans,
outstanding bonds and other obligations assumed by the
board under this subsection. The report shall specify each
grant, loan, bond and other obligation still outstanding
and the amount, terms and conditions of each grant, loan,
bond and other obligation.

9-2-2601. Department of workforce services; duties
and responsibilities; agreements with other agencies
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
authorized; definition; merger with department of
employment.

(d) The department shall administer expenditures from
the workforce development training fund as provided in W.S.
9-2-2604. The department shall administer expenditures from
the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector
partnership subaccount within the economic diversification
account as provided in W.S. 9-2-2609 through 9-2-2611. and
9-12-1404.

9-2-2604. Workforce development training fund
established.

(c) Expenditures from the workforce development
training fund for purposes authorized in subsection (b) of
this section shall be approved by the director of the
department of workforce services based on procedures,
criteria and performance measures established by
regulations. Notification of expenditures approved under
paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv) of this section and a copy of
the training fund application shall be provided to the
Wyoming business council. The director of the department of
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
workforce services shall report annually to the governor
and the legislature on the expenditures made from the
training fund in the preceding fiscal year and the results
of the activities funded by the training fund.

9-2-2610. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xii) "Priority economic sector business" means
an employer engaged in establishing or expanding operations
within a priority economic sector identified in the twenty
(20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy
approved by the governor pursuant to W.S. 9-12-1402 in
Wyoming that through the employment of knowledge or labor
add value to a product, process or export service that
results in the creation of new wealth;

(xvi) "Wyoming workforce development-priority
economic sector partnership subaccount account" or
"subaccount" "account" means the subaccount account created
in W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(iii) 9-2-2611(p);

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
9-2-2611. Priority economic sector business workforce
training programs; eligibility.

(a) The department, in consultation with the
coordinator of economic diversification shall administer
the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector
partnership program. Using available monies within the
Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector
partnership subaccount account, the department may contract
to provide training funds for education or skills based
training for employees for priority economic sector
businesses in new jobs. The funds shall be provided to
eligible training providers in accordance with contracts
between the department, priority economic sector business
employers and eligible training providers, for the purpose
of providing employees with education and training required
for jobs in new or expanding priority economic sector
businesses in the state.

(c) An applicant shall provide a match of at least
one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00) requested
from the subaccount account. The match may include new
loans and investments and expenditures for direct project
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
related costs such as new equipment and buildings. The
department may consider recent purchases of fixed assets
directly related to the proposal on a case-by-case basis. A
purchase of fixed assets directly related to the proposed
training activities that have been made within ninety (90)
days after submission of the application may be considered
eligible by the department.

(m) The Wyoming business council shall assist the
department with review of information provided under
paragraphs (h)(i) and (ii) of this section, as requested by
the department. If the department determines that an
applicant meets the criteria established in this section
and has complied with the applicable procedures and review
processes established by the department, the department may
recommend funding for a priority economic sector business
workforce development program and the disbursement of funds
under contract to the eligible training provider. The
recipient eligible training provider shall use funds
received under the program in accordance with the
provisions of the contract. No funding shall be provided
for any program without the written opinion of the attorney
general certifying the legality of the transaction and all
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
documents connected therein. Upon recommendation of the
department, certification by the attorney general, and
approval by the governor or his designee, funding from the
Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector
partnership subaccount account may be distributed to the
eligible training provider.

(o) The department shall:

(ii) Report annually to the joint appropriations
committee on the expenditures made from the Wyoming
workforce development-priority economic sector partnership
subaccount account in the preceding fiscal year and the
results of each partnership project's activities.

(p) The Wyoming workforce development-priority
economic sector partnership subaccount created in W.S.
9-12-1404(a)(iii) is hereby continued as the Wyoming
workforce development-priority economic sector partnership
account. Funds within this account may be expended:

(i) As approved by director of the department of
workforce services for administrative costs incurred by the
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
department of workforce services associated with
administration of the Wyoming workforce
development-priority economic sector partnership program
under W.S. 9-2-2609 through 9-2-2611; and

(ii) As approved by the governor or the
governor's designee to provide funding for agreements
entered into pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2609 through 9-2-2611.

9-2-2906. Office of the state chief information
officer and director; authority; duties of department.

(b) The department shall carry out the following
coordination and management functions:

(xii) Enhance statewide broadband adoption and
coordination among all governmental users in coordination
with the Wyoming business council state loan and investment
board and its broadband advisory council;

9-2-3001. State construction department created;
definitions.

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(b) As used in this article:

(i) "Agency" means any school district, state
office, department, board, council, commission, separate
operating agency, institution or other instrumentality or
operating unit of the state excluding the University of
Wyoming, the Wyoming business council and the Wyoming
department of transportation. "Agency" shall include a
Wyoming community college if the community college is
conducting a capital construction project using state funds
that requires approval by the community college commission
or authorization by the legislature under W.S.
21-18-205(g);

9-4-715. Permissible investments.

(n) The state treasurer shall not invest state funds
for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the
legislature in excess of a total of one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000.00), excluding investments made pursuant to
W.S. 37-5-406 or 37-5-605. By November 1 of each calendar
year, the state treasurer, in consultation with the board,
the Wyoming water development office, the Wyoming business
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
council and the office of state lands and investments,
shall provide a report to the select committee on capital
financing and investments and the investment funds
committee on all state funds invested for a specific public
purpose authorized or directed by the legislature. The
report shall include:

9-12-1002. General powers and duties of the board;
rulemaking authority.

(a) The board shall be responsible for implementing
the tourism program, and functions assigned to the Wyoming
business council under the Wyoming Economic Development
Act, including the expenditure of all funds appropriated
for the tourism program and shall:

9-12-1501. Broadband development program established;
purposes; eligibility; definitions.

(a) A broadband funding program is established under
the Wyoming business council state loan and investment
board to provide funds to eligible applicants in order to
promote the expansion of access to broadband service in
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
unserved areas of the state. Upon request by the board, the
office of state lands and investments shall provide
administrative and technical support to the board for the
program.

(d) A governmental entity specified in subparagraph
(c)(ii)(A) or (B) of this section shall develop a request
for proposals, as prescribed by the council board, on such
a form as may be promulgated by the council board, inviting
business entities to participate in a project proposed for
funding under this article. If no eligible business entity
responds to the request for proposal with a proposal
meeting the requirements specified, the governmental entity
specified in subparagraph (c)(ii)(A) or (B) may apply
individually, or jointly with any other governmental entity
specified in subparagraph (c)(ii)(A) or (B) of this
section.

(e) As used in this article, until established
otherwise by rule of the Wyoming business council board
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, "unserved area"
is an area in which there exists no fixed terrestrial
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
broadband service, or in which the maximum fixed
terrestrial broadband speed available:

(f) The Wyoming business council may, by rule
effective on July 1, 2022, modify the definition of
"unserved area" for purposes of this article, until July 1,
2026. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the board may, by rule,
modify the definition of "unserved area" for purposes of
this article. The rule shall only modify the definition by
providing for upload and download speeds exceeding those
specified in subsection (e) of this section as the business
council or board determines appropriate for technological
conditions prevailing as of July 1, 2022 the date the rule
takes effect.

(g) The Wyoming business council board shall by rule
establish a definition of "business corridor" for purposes
of this article. An area shall not be considered a business
corridor unless multiple businesses are, or have undertaken
permitting, construction or other substantial steps to be,
located in proximity to each other.

(h) As used in this article:
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(iii) "Board" means the state loan and
investment board.

9-12-1502. Application process.

(a) An eligible applicant shall submit an application
to the council board on a form prescribed by the council
board. The council board shall develop administrative
procedures governing the application and funding process.
by September 1, 2018. The council board shall be
responsible for receiving and reviewing applications,
entering into contracts and authorizing the distribution of
funds under this article, subject to approval by the
governor or his designee.

(b) The council board shall provide for funding
periods not less frequently than biannually. At least
thirty (30) days prior to the first day of the funding
period for which applications may be submitted, the council
board shall publish on its official website the specific
criteria and any quantitative weighting scheme or scoring
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
system the council board will use to evaluate or rank
applications.

9-12-1503. Application contents; application
modification.

(a) An applicant for funding under this article shall
provide the following information on the application:

(xiii) Additional information requested by the
council board.

(b) The council board may require an applicant to
submit additional information to enable the council board
to properly assess the application for funding. The council
board may request an applicant to modify an application
based on current broadband access in the proposed
geographic broadband service area before awarding funding
under this article.

(c) The council board shall, after providing
opportunity for public comment, promulgate rules on or
before September 1, 2021 that identify the nature and type
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
of information provided by broadband providers to the
council board that shall be treated as confidential, trade
secret or proprietary and that shall be protected from
disclosure to the public. The following information shall
not be considered confidential, trade secret or proprietary
and shall be subject to disclosure to the public:

(vi) Information deemed public information by
the council board after a hearing on the issue.

9-12-1504. Challenge process.

(a) Within three (3) business days of the close of
the funding application process, the council board shall
publish on its official website the proposed geographic
broadband service area and the proposed broadband service
speeds for each application submitted and shall notify each
broadband provider who is listed with the council board as
providing broadband service in the proposed project area of
the application and proposed project. The notification to
each listed broadband provider shall include the shapefile
or map submitted by the applicant under W.S.
9-12-1503(a)(i). An existing broadband service provider
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
may, within fourteen (14) business days of publication of
the information, submit in writing to the council board a
challenge to an application. A challenge shall contain
information demonstrating that:

(b) The council board shall evaluate the information
submitted in a provider's challenge under this section, and
is prohibited from funding a project if the council board
determines the provider is currently providing broadband
service or the provider's commitment to provide broadband
service that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section in the proposed project area is credible.

(c) If the council board denies funding to an
applicant as a result of a broadband service provider's
challenge made under this section, and the broadband
service provider does not fulfill the provider's commitment
to provide broadband service in the project area, the
challenging provider is prohibited from applying for
funding for a project under this article for the following
five (5) years, and the council board is prohibited from
denying funding to an applicant as a result of a challenge
by the same broadband service provider for the following
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
five (5) years, unless the council board determines that
the broadband service provider's failure to fulfill the
provider's commitment was the result of factors beyond the
broadband service provider's control.

9-12-1505. Funding determinations.

(a) In evaluating applications and providing funding
under this article, the council board shall give highest
priority to applications which that the council board
determines are public private partnerships.

(b) In evaluating applications and entering into
agreements to provide funding, the council board shall give
priority to applications that meet one (1) or more of the
following criteria, with additional priority given for
meeting multiple criteria:

(c) The council board shall endeavor to award grants
under this section to qualified applicants in
geographically diverse regions of the state.

9-12-1506. Limitations.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(c) The council board shall, by rule, adopt
provisions rules to ensure that adequate consideration is
provided for the expenditure of public funds on projects
funded under this article.

9-12-1507. Application evaluation report.

(a) By June 30 of each year, following adoption of
the state broadband enhancement plan, the council board
shall publish on its website and provide to the joint
minerals, business and economic development interim
committee a list of all applications for funding under this
article received during the previous year and, for each
application:

(i) The results of any quantitative weighting
scheme or scoring system the council board used to fund the
applications;

(b) Within ninety (90) days after a project's
proposed completion date, the council board shall review
the project and provide in the report under subsection (a)
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
of this section, its determination of whether the project
was completed and services rendered in accordance with the
agreement under this article. If the council board reports
that a project was not completed or services are not being
rendered in accordance with an agreement, it shall report
actions it has taken to enforce the agreement.

9-12-1509. Broadband advisory council; broadband
coordinator.

(a) The business council board shall, in consultation
with the economically needed diversity options for Wyoming
(ENDOW) executive council, establish a broadband advisory
council consisting of eleven (11) members. One (1) member
shall be the state chief information officer or his the
officer's designee. Remaining members shall be appointed
by the council board from the public at-large, with
geographic diversity and to include diverse interests,
including backgrounds in economic development, state or
local government entities, broadband providers, technology
related businesses, health care, education, library
services and public safety. At least one (1) representative
of the Northern Arapaho or Eastern Shoshone tribes of the
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
Wind River Indian Reservation shall be appointed to the
advisory council. One (1) senator appointed by the
president of the senate and one (1) representative
appointed by the speaker of the house shall serve as
legislative liaisons to the advisory council. Legislative
liaisons shall be paid salary, per diem and mileage as
provided in W.S. 28-5-101 when attending meetings of the
advisory council. Members of the advisory council shall
receive no salary, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.
9-3-102 and 9-3-103 for per diem and travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.

(b) The advisory council shall provide advice and
make recommendations to the business council board on the
following subjects:

(iii) Coordination with the ENDOW executive
council, the state chief information officer and local and
tribal governmental entities to ensure that state and local
policies are conducive to development of broadband
services;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(iv) Applications received under this article,
as requested by the council board;

(v) Propose to the council board:

(A) A state broadband enhancement plan, for
adoption by the council not later than September 1, 2018
board;

(c) The business council board shall, in consultation
with the ENDOW executive council office of state lands and
investments and the governor's office, designate an
employee of the business council board or the office of
state lands and investments as coordinator of broadband
services. The person designated shall have expertise in
telecommunications and specifically in the provision of
broadband services. As directed by the business council
board, the coordinator shall staff the broadband advisory
council. The coordinator shall, with approval of the
business council board, accomplish the tasks set forth in
paragraphs (b)(i) through (v) of this section and undertake
other duties as assigned by the business council board in
consultation with the governor's office. The business
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
council board may contract with a consultant to provide
services to the broadband advisory council and to the
business council board under this act.

9-12-1510. Middle-mile broadband projects.

(a) The council board may fund middle-mile broadband
projects upon receiving an application as provided under
this article. The provisions of this article shall apply to
middle-mile broadband projects except as otherwise provided
by this section. The council board shall not fund
middle-mile broadband projects under this article unless:

(v) The broadband provider agrees to:

(A) Allow the council board to participate
in arbitration of determining reasonable rates in the event
of unsuccessful negotiations between the funding recipient
and another broadband provider for access to the
infrastructure; and

(B) Provide to the council board upon the
council's board's request any marketing information based
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
on current leases to assist the council board in
determining reasonable rates for access to the
infrastructure for the project funded under this article.
Any information provided under this subparagraph shall be
confidential and shall not be disclosed by the council
board.

(b) The council board shall promulgate rules for the
funding of middle-mile broadband projects as provided by
this section.

9-23-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Agency" means any school district, state
office, department, board, council, commission, separate
operating agency, institution or other instrumentality or
operating unit of the state excluding the University of
Wyoming, community college districts, the Wyoming business
council and the Wyoming department of transportation;

9-23-105. Selection procedures; emergency waiver.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(f) Every agency, the University of Wyoming, each
community college district, the Wyoming business council
and the Wyoming department of transportation shall base
selection of a firm for professional services in accordance
with the following:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection and subsection (g) of this section, the agency,
the University of Wyoming, each community college district,
the Wyoming business council and the Wyoming department of
transportation shall select firms that are resident firms
as defined by this act. Consideration between firms shall
be based upon:

(ii) Nonresident firms may be selected if no
firms on file, together with any applications submitted for
the project, are resident firms as defined by this act or
if the resident firms are determined not qualified by the
agency, the University of Wyoming, each community college
district, the Wyoming business council or the Wyoming
department of transportation. Consideration of qualified
nonresident firms shall be based upon the considerations
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
listed in subparagraphs (i)(A) through (G) of this
subsection.

(h) Whenever an emergency arises requiring
professional services, the principal representative of an
agency, the University of Wyoming, the community college
district, the Wyoming business council and the Wyoming
department of transportation may waive any applicable
requirement of W.S. 9-23-104 and this section if the
requirement endangers the health, welfare or safety of the
public.

9-23-106. Contract procedure.

(g) If selection of a resident firm is required under
this act, the contract for professional services entered
into by an agency, the University of Wyoming, each
community college district, the Wyoming business council or
the Wyoming department of transportation shall contain a
certification by the resident firm providing professional
services that the firm will comply with W.S.
9-23-102(a)(vi)(B). This subsection shall not be construed
to require a firm to comply with W.S. 9-23-102(a)(vi)(B) if
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
the proposed project is exempt from residence firm
selection by W.S. 9-23-105(g) or if selection of a resident
firm is waived in accordance with W.S. 9-23-105(h).

10-3-601. Wyoming air services enhancement;
legislative findings; Wyoming aeronautics commission
authority to contract for services; requirements.

(c) The commission has primary responsibility and may
consult with or delegate to the aeronautics division of the
Wyoming department of transportation, Wyoming business
council or other entities as necessary, to develop criteria
and contracts for financial aid under this section.

11-10-115. State fair board; membership; terms;
compensation.

(a) There is created the state fair board consisting
of the following members:

(vi) One (1) voting member appointed by the
governor from the who is a representative of Wyoming
business council interests;
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

15-1-709. Advice and information.

The executive director of the Wyoming business council and
the University of Wyoming shall furnish advice and
information in connection with a project when requested to
do so by a county or municipality.

17-11-104. Powers of corporation generally.

(a) In furtherance of its purposes the corporation
shall, subject to the restrictions and limitations herein
contained, have the following powers:

(iv) To cooperate with and avail itself of the
facilities of the United States department of commerce, the
Wyoming business council created by W.S. 9-12-103 and any
other similar state or federal governmental agencies; and
to cooperate with and assist, and otherwise encourage
organizations in the various communities of the state in
the promotion, assistance, and development of the business
prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of
this state or of any part thereof;
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

17-11-110. Board of directors.

(a) The business and affairs of the corporation shall
be managed and conducted by a board of directors, which
shall consist of not less than five (5) nor more than seven
(7) members. One (1) member of the board shall be the chief
executive officer of the Wyoming business council or other
person designated by the council. The board of directors
may exercise all the powers of the corporation except such
as are conferred by law or by the articles of incorporation
or the bylaws of the corporation upon the shareholders or
members.

21-16-1905. Administration; rules and regulations.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this article in consultation with the
University of Wyoming, the department of workforce
services, the Wyoming business council and other
stakeholders, including industry representatives. The rules
shall provide for a preference to award scholarships which
considers workforce shortages and economic development
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
needs of the communities, regions and the state. First
preference shall be given to students who received a
scholarship under this article in the immediately preceding
academic term and remain eligible to receive a scholarship
under W.S. 21-16-1904(c). Second preference shall be given
to students who have secured an industry sponsorship.
Preference may be given to students based on the length of
their Wyoming residency. Preference may be given to
students without a degree.

21-18-104. Small business development centers.

The small business development centers shall be operated by
the University of Wyoming. The university shall specify the
organizational structure of the network of centers. in
consultation with the Wyoming business council created by
W.S. 9-12-103. The university shall integrate the
operations of the centers with the Wyoming business council
to the fullest extent permitted by federal law.

27-13-102. Powers and duties; rules and regulations.

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(a) The division shall, in conjunction with the
department of education, the business council, the
department of workforce services, the workforce development
council, the University of Wyoming and the community
college commission, establish and maintain a plan to
implement the occupational transfer and retraining programs
and services for displaced workers created under this act.
The plan shall designate:

37-5-503. Purposes; report; duties.

(j) Before any appropriation is made to the
authority, the authority shall submit its budget for review
as provided by W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014. Any
appropriation to the authority shall be expended only for
administrative purposes, which shall include planning and
research, and for purposes of operating the programs
specified in W.S. 37-5-701 through 37-5-703 and 37-5-801
through 37-5-804.

(k) The authority shall operate and administer:

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(i) The Wyoming energy conservation improvement
program, pursuant to W.S. 37-5-701 through 37-5-703;

(ii) The Wyoming minerals to value added
products program, pursuant to W.S. 37-5-801 through
37-5-804.

37-5-504. Powers of the authority.

(a) The authority may:

(xiii) Work in consultation and coordination
with entities including the Wyoming business council to
develop, promote and identify markets for natural resources
associated with energy and facilitate supply for those
markets;

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:

(S) Subject to meeting the applicable
provisions of this subparagraph, the following purchases by
a data processing services center as defined in W.S.
39-15-101(a)(xliv):

(III) For the purpose of claiming the
exemptions in subdivisions (I) and (II) of this
subparagraph, the purchaser shall demonstrate to the
department that he:

(4) Has received certification
from the Wyoming business council provided sufficient
documentation to the department for the department to
determine that the purchaser has created or will create a
number of jobs in Wyoming that is appropriate to the size
and stage of development of the data processing services
center; as determined by the Wyoming business council;

39-16-105. Exemptions.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:

(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:

(H) Subject to meeting the applicable
provisions of this subparagraph, the following purchases by
a data processing services center as defined in W.S.
39-15-101(a)(xliv):

(III) For the purpose of claiming the
exemptions in subdivisions (I) and (II) of this
subparagraph, the purchaser shall demonstrate to the
department that he:

(4) Has received certification
from the Wyoming business council provided sufficient
documentation to the department for the department to
determine that the purchaser has created or will create a
number of jobs in Wyoming that is appropriate to the size
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
and stage of development of the data processing services
center; as determined by the Wyoming business council;

40-11-102. Application by public corporation to
establish and operate zone; designation of agency to apply
on behalf of state.

(b) The Wyoming business council governor is the
public entity hereby designated and authorized to apply, on
behalf of the state of Wyoming, for foreign trade zone
authority, sub-zone authority or port of entry pursuant to
the act of congress and regulations issued pursuant to the
act.

(c) The designation of the Wyoming business council
governor to apply on behalf of the state of Wyoming for
foreign trade zone or sub-zone authority shall not prohibit
other public corporations from applying for foreign trade
zone authority pursuant to the act of congress.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
alter or abrogate any foreign trade zone authority,
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
sub-zone authority or port of entry applied for by the
Wyoming business council before July 1, 2026.

Section 6. W.S. 9-12-1201 through 9-12-1203 as
37-5-701 through 37-5-703 and 9-20-101 through 9-20-104 as
37-5-801 through 37-5-804 are amended and renumbered to
read:

ARTICLE 7
WYOMING ENERGY PERFORMANCE PROGRAM

9-12-1201 37-5-701. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Agency" means a branch, agency, department,
board, instrumentality or institution of the state of
Wyoming, a county, a municipal corporation, a school
district, a community college district, the University of
Wyoming, the cooperative tribal governing body, the Eastern
Shoshone Tribe, the Northern Arapaho Tribe, a joint powers
board formed pursuant to this act or a special district
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
specifically involved in providing facilities or functions
enumerated in W.S. 16-1-104(c);

(ii) "Energy conservation measure" means an
energy study, audit, improvement or equipment that is
designed to provide energy, water and operational cost
savings at least equivalent to the amount expended by a
facility owner for such energy study, audit, improvement or
equipment over a period of not more than twenty (20) years
after the date such improvement or equipment is installed
or becomes operational;

(iii) "Energy performance contract" means the
contract that allows a facility owner to accomplish energy
or water efficiency projects without upfront capital costs
or capital appropriations. An energy performance contract
shall not be considered to be a contract for public
improvement pursuant to W.S. 15-1-113;

(iv) "Energy services company" means the
contractor not organized under the auspices of a utility
regulated by the public service commission with
demonstrated technical, operational, financial and
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
managerial capabilities to design and implement energy
conservation measures and the ability to secure necessary
financial measures to ensure related guarantees for
operational cost savings and who is responsible for the
audit, design, implementation, measurement, verification
and guarantee of savings for individual projects;

(v) "Facility owner" means an agency or group of
agencies, a public hospital or other public entity
responsible for an individual facility or group of
facilities;

(vi) "Investment grade energy audit" means the
detailed engineering investigation and report of a
facility's current energy and water consuming equipment
inventory, condition, operation, maintenance and
performance, energy baseline, potential energy and water
efficiency upgrades, life cycle costs and risks for future
performance that provides the justification for the energy
performance contract project;

(vii) "Wyoming energy conservation improvement
program" means the Wyoming business council state energy
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
office program within the Wyoming energy authority designed
to enable and support development and implementation of
energy performance contract projects.

9-12-1202 37-5-702. Energy performance contracting.

The council Wyoming energy authority shall establish a
Wyoming energy conservation improvement program which that
provides support development and implementation of energy
performance contract projects to facility owners
voluntarily participating in the program. In order to
participate in the program, facility owners and energy
services companies shall be subject to the provisions of
this article and rules adopted pursuant to this article.

9-12-1203 37-5-703. Energy performance contracting.

(a) Upon receipt of a request from a facility owner,
the Wyoming business council energy authority shall provide
the facility owner with a list of energy service companies
interested in providing services to the facility owner and
qualified by the Wyoming business council energy authority
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
to participate in the Wyoming energy conservation
improvement program.

(b) The energy services company participating in the
Wyoming energy conservation improvement program shall
provide an investment grade audit showing the estimated
energy and operational cost savings that would result from
the proposed energy conservation measures. Before
executing any contract or lease purchase agreement under
subsection (c) of this section, the energy services company
shall provide the facility owner with plans for the
proposed energy conservation measures prepared by an
engineer licensed to practice in Wyoming.

(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 15-1-113 and subject to the
provisions of subsection (e) of this section, a facility
owner may enter into an installment payment contract or
lease purchase agreement for an energy or water
conservation measure which meets the criteria of this
section. Any documents related to negotiations entered
into pursuant to this section with individual energy
services companies by an agency or facility owner shall be
considered trade secrets pursuant to the provisions of the
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S. 16-4-201 through 16-4-205.
After a contract has been executed by an agency, the
contract and all proposals from energy service companies
shall be open records available for public inspection in
accordance with the Wyoming Public Records Act.

(d) Energy performance contracts entered into
pursuant to the Wyoming energy conservation improvement
program shall require the energy services company to
provide to the facility owner an annual reconciliation of
the guaranteed energy savings. If the reconciliation
reveals a shortfall in annual energy savings, the energy
services company shall be liable for compensation to the
facility owner for such shortfall under the provisions of
the energy performance contract. If the reconciliation
reveals an excess in annual energy savings, the excess
savings shall be retained by the facility owner and shall
not be used to cover potential energy savings shortages in
subsequent contract years.

(e) An energy performance contract entered into
pursuant to the Wyoming energy conservation improvement
program may provide for financing, including tax exempt
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
financing, by a third party. The contract for third party
financing may be separate from the energy performance
contract. A separate contract for third party financing
shall include a provision that the third party financier
shall not be granted rights or privileges that exceed the
rights and privileges available to the energy services
company.

(f) The Wyoming business council energy authority may
provide support under the Wyoming energy conservation
improvement program as requested by facility owners for
purposes of this section. The Wyoming business council
state energy office authority may fix, charge and collect
reasonable fees for any administrative support and
resources or other services provided by the Wyoming
business council authority pursuant to this subsection.

(g) If the facility owner fails to appropriate or
receive an appropriation of money for a periodic payment
due for improvements made through an energy performance
contract, any security interest in any property created
pursuant to the energy performance contract, may be
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
enforced by the holder of such a security interest against
the property.

(h) The term of an energy performance contract shall
not exceed twenty (20) years after the date on which the
work required by the energy performance contract to
implement all energy conservation measures is completed.

(j) The Wyoming business council energy authority
shall submit to the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee by October 1, an annual
report on the energy performance contracting performed
under the Wyoming energy conservation improvement program.
The report shall include the number of applications
submitted, the number of facility owners, the number of
energy performance contracts, the results of the investment
grade energy audits and the results of the energy
performance contracts.

ARTICLE 8
WYOMING MINERALS TO VALUE ADDED PRODUCTS PROGRAM

9-20-101 37-5-801. Definitions.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(a) As used in this article act:

(i) "Account" means the minerals to value added
product program account created pursuant to W.S.
9-20-104(a) 37-5-804(a);

(ii) "Minerals to value added products facility"
includes a commercial scale mineral to liquid fuels or
other value added products facilities but shall not include
any facility which will derive fifty percent (50%) or more
of its anticipated revenues from the generation of
electricity;

(iii) "Program" means the minerals to value
added products program created pursuant to W.S. 9-20-102(a)
37-5-802(a);

(iv) "Tolling fee" means a negotiated fee for
the conversion of a feedstock mineral provided by the state
of Wyoming under a contract with the operator of a value
added facility;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(v) "This act" means W.S. 9-20-101 37-5-801
through 9-20-104 37-5-804.

9-20-102 37-5-802. Wyoming mineral to value added
product program; rulemaking authority.

(a) There is created the Wyoming minerals to value
added products program. The program is intended to aid
economic development of the state by providing mineral
product input guarantees to enable the recruitment and
operation of commercial scale minerals to value added
products facilities, which have demonstrated proof of
performance.

(b) The Wyoming business council energy authority
shall establish and administer the program under this act.
Any commercial scale minerals to value added products
facility shall submit a proposal to the governor. The
governor may provide recommendations for the size and
parameters of the proposed contract. An application to
participate in the program shall then be submitted to and
reviewed by the Wyoming business council under the process
set forth in W.S. 9-12-601 through 9-12-603 energy
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
authority board. The application shall be submitted on
forms prescribed by, and subject to rules promulgated by,
the Wyoming business council energy authority. In
determining whether to recommend a contract for approval,
the Wyoming business council authority shall consider if
the applicant has demonstrated a business plan, balance
sheet, sufficient cash flow, commitments to sell the
finished product and other indices necessary to demonstrate
the applicant's ability to perform under the contract as
determined by rule and regulation of the Wyoming business
council authority.

(c) The Wyoming business council energy authority
shall provide recommendations for terms and conditions
contained in a proposed contract. The Wyoming business
council's authority's recommendations shall be forwarded to
the state loan and investment board for final consideration
of the application.

(d) After an application to participate in the
program is approved by the state loan and investment board,
the Wyoming business council authority may complete
negotiations to contract to supply not more than twenty
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
percent (20%) of the expected mineral supply to the
facility for the duration of the contract. Total contract
amounts for any one (1) facility shall be set by rule of
the state loan and investment board based on the provisions
of this act and the expected return to the state of
Wyoming, but in no event shall a contract exceed fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000.00).

(e) All complete applications to participate in the
minerals to value added products program established under
this act which conform to the criteria established by this
act and rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, shall
be considered. The Wyoming business council energy
authority shall review the application and may communicate
directly with the applicant. A determination by the state
loan and investment board to approve or disapprove an
application under this act is not appealable.

(f) If the Wyoming business council energy authority
receives multiple applications to enter a contract under
the program, consideration shall be given to whether the
applicant has demonstrated a past record of producing jobs
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
in Wyoming and whether the applicant has and is likely to
maintain a nexus to the state of Wyoming.

9-20-103 37-5-803. Criteria and procedures for
contracts.

(a) In determining whether to recommend or approve a
contract under this act, the Wyoming business council
energy authority and state loan and investment board shall
consider if:

(i) There are sufficient funds in the account to
fully fund the contract and all other outstanding
commitments to the account;

(ii) The contract establishes the terms and
conditions of the contract as required by this act,
including, but not necessarily limited to:

(A) The duration of the contract to provide
feedstock minerals, including the end date for the
contract;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(B) Criteria to determine proof of
performance on the part of the minerals to value added
products facility prior to expenditure of funds by the
state of Wyoming under the contract;

(C) Tolling fees for the conversion of the
state's feedstock to a value added product;

(D) Procedures and mechanisms for the sale
of the finished product produced under the contract and the
deposit of the proceeds of those sales to the account as
provided in W.S. 9-20-104 37-5-804.

(b) Contracts considered under this act shall be
subject to the following procedures:

(i) The proposed contract shall be submitted to
the Wyoming business council energy authority for review
and determination; under the process set forth in W.S.
9-12-601 through 9-12-603;

(ii) The Wyoming business council's energy
authority's recommendations shall be forwarded to the state
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
loan and investment board for final consideration of the
contract.

(c) The Wyoming business council energy authority
shall only recommend, and the state loan and investment
board shall only approve, entering into contracts under
this act for minerals to value added products facility
projects which that meet the following minimum
requirements:

(i) Are anticipated to have a beneficial
economic impact to the state of Wyoming and provide the
following minimum public benefits:

(A) The creation of a substantial expansion
of permanent jobs in the county or counties in which the
project will be located;

(B) A substantial increase in the assessed
valuation of the county or counties in which the projects
will be located;

SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
(C) A substantial increase in the sales,
property or other tax revenues to the county or counties
where the project will be located;

(D) Promotion of a stable, balanced and
diversified economy; and

(E) Private investment in the county or
counties in buildings, equipment and direct project
infrastructure of not less than three (3) times the amount
of any contract.

(ii) Provide adequate consideration for the
state of Wyoming to enter the contract;

(iii) The feedstock materials supplied under the
contract shall have been produced substantially in Wyoming;

(iv) The contract shall not create debt of the
state of Wyoming beyond the current year's taxes;

(v) The facility to which the feedstock
materials is to be supplied has not previously been
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
supplied with feedstock materials from a contract entered
into under the program; and

(vi) The terms of the contract are such that the
state of Wyoming is likely to realize a positive return on
its investment under the contract.

(d) No contract shall be entered into under this act
without the written opinion of the attorney general
certifying the legality of the transaction and all
documents connected therewith.

(e) The governor, Wyoming business council energy
authority or state loan and investment board is authorized
to employ such experts as necessary to fully evaluate an
application and negotiate the terms and conditions of a
contract under this act. If experts are retained, the cost
for the experts shall be paid by the applicant.

(f) The Wyoming business council energy authority may
contract with such experts as necessary to assist in the
performance of its obligations under any contract entered
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
into, including assistance with feed stock feedstock
purchases and the sale of value added products.

9-20-104 37-5-804. Wyoming mineral to value added
product program account; purpose; creation; rulemaking.

(a) There is created a minerals to value added
products program account. Funds in the account shall be
used exclusively to promote minerals to value added
products facilities as provided in this act.

(b) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the
program shall be deposited into the account. All funds in
the account are continuously appropriated for contracts and
other expenses authorized under this act. The total
principal balance of outstanding contracts shall not exceed
the amounts appropriated by the legislature plus revenues
accrued and collected less any losses, currently available
in the account.

(c) Any unexpended balance in the account shall be
invested by the state treasurer and the interest earned
shall be credited to the account.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

(d) Revenues generated from any contract entered into
under this act shall be deposited into the account and
continuously appropriated to the Wyoming business council
energy authority to be expended solely for the purpose of
administering this act and contracts authorized hereunder,
except as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

(e) The Wyoming business council energy authority
shall report by November 1 of each year to the joint
appropriations committee and the joint minerals, business
and economic development interim committee on the status
and condition of the program and the account. The report
required under this subsection, and all its contents, shall
be a public record. In addition to factors listed in this
subsection, the Wyoming business council's energy
authority's report shall include the account fund balance
and anticipated potential expenditures, including
contracts, under the program for the next three (3) fiscal
years, respectively. The joint appropriations committee
shall then determine whether to introduce legislation to
appropriate a portion, or all, of the funds in the account
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
for purposes other than the program. The report shall
further include:

(i) A review of rules adopted by the Wyoming
business council energy authority or state loan and
investment board during the reporting period;

(ii) The portfolio of contracts entered into
under the program;

(iii) A risk analysis of the portfolio;

(iv) Any other relevant information as
determined by the state loan and investment board or the
Wyoming business council energy authority.

Section 7. W.S. 9-2-2018(e)(iii), 9-2-2610(a)(iv),
9-12-101 through 9-12-106, 9-12-108 through 9-12-308,
9-12-601 through 9-12-603, 9-12-801 through 9-12-804,
9-12-901 through 9-12-905, 9-12-1002(b), 9-12-1101 through
9-12-1105, 9-12-1301 through 9-12-1405, 26-4-103(m),
35-12-110(b)(xvi), 37-5-502(c)(ii) and 41-2-117(a)(i)(J)(II)
are repealed.
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394

Section 8.

(a) There is authorized two (2) full-time positions
for the state budget department for purposes of
implementing this act. These positions shall be effective
for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that these
full-time positions be included in the standard budget of
the state budget department for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

(b) There is appropriated two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) from the general fund to the state budget
department for purposes of funding the full-time positions
authorized in subsection (a) of this section. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that the portions
of this appropriation associated with ongoing expenses of
SF0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0394
the two (2) positions authorized in subsection (a) of this
section be included in the standard budget of the state
budget department for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

Section 9.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 1 through 3 and 9 of this act are
effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section
8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0065